src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-2A-shpeaekkted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - špeäkkted: # Verb 'pop/naksahtaa' - full paradigm
     špeäkkted+V+Inf: špeäkkted
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: špeäkktam
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: špeäkktak
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: špeäkkat
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: špeäkktep
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: špeäkkteʹped
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: špeäkkte 
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: špeäkktet
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: špeäkkat
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: špeäkktem
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: špeäkktiǩ
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: špeäkkti
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: špeäkktim
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: špeäkktid
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: špeäkkte
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: špeäkkteš
     špeäkkted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: špeäkktam
     špeäkkted+V+Pot+Sg1: špeäkkteʹžem
     špeäkkted+V+Pot+Sg2: špeäkkteʹžiǩ
     špeäkkted+V+Pot+Sg3: špeäkktež
     špeäkkted+V+Pot+Pl1: špeäkkteʹžep
     špeäkkted+V+Pot+Pl2: špeäkkteʹžid
     špeäkkted+V+Pot+Pl3: špeäkkteʹže
     špeäkkted+V+Pot+Sg4: špeäkkteʹžet
     špeäkkted+V+Pot+ConNeg: špeäkkteʹže
     špeäkkted+V+Cond+Sg1: špeäkkteʹčem
     špeäkkted+V+Cond+Sg2: špeäkkteʹčiǩ
     špeäkkted+V+Cond+Sg3: špeäkkteʹči
     špeäkkted+V+Cond+Pl1: špeäkkteʹčim
     špeäkkted+V+Cond+Pl2: špeäkkteʹčid
     špeäkkted+V+Cond+Pl3: špeäkkteʹče
     špeäkkted+V+Cond+Sg4: špeäkkteʹčeš
     špeäkkted+V+Cond+ConNeg: špeäkkteʹče
     špeäkkted+V+Imprt+Sg2: špeäkkat
     špeäkkted+V+Imprt+Sg3: špeäkktââǥǥas
     špeäkkted+V+Imprt+Pl1: špeäkktâkap
     špeäkkted+V+Imprt+Pl2: špeäkkteʹǩed
     špeäkkted+V+Imprt+Pl3: špeäkktâkaz
     špeäkkted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: špeäkktuku
     špeäkkted+V+Actio+Ess: špeäkkteʹmmen
     špeäkkted+V+Actio: špeäkktem
     špeäkkted+V+Act+PrsPrc: špeäkkteei
     špeäkkted+V+Act+PrfPrc: špeäkktam
     špeäkkted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: špeäkktum
     špeäkkted+V+VAbess: špeäkkteǩâni
     špeäkkted+V+Ger+Ess: špeäkkteen
     špeäkkted+V+Ger+Instr: špeäkkteeʹl
     špeäkkted+V+Der/musj+N+Sg+Nom: špeäkktummuš
